Vermont, session 2025-2026, H140.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly to improve health outcomes and to
prevent avoidable care and over utilization of institutional care, particularly
among heavy utilizers by expanding access in rural communities to community
nurses and community care coordinators, as recommended in the report
completed by the Green Mountain Care Board’s consultant in accordance with
2022 Acts and Resolves No. 167.
VT LEG #379748 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.140
2025 Page 2 of 5
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. chapter 222 is amended to read:
Chapter 222. ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONALS
§ 9490. COMMUNITY NURSE AND COMMUNITY CARE
COORDINATOR GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Grant program established. The Department of Health shall administer
a grant program for the purpose of establishing community nurse or
community care coordinator programs in Vermont communities. The
Commissioner shall award grants of up to $10,000.00 per municipality to fund
a community nurse or community care coordinator program in the
municipality, provided the municipal applicant meets the criteria set forth in
this section and rule. As used in this section, “municipality” means a city,
town, or incorporated village in the State.
(b) Grant eligibility.
(1) General criteria. A municipality may submit a grant application to
the Department each year during the period specified by the Department in
rule. Successful grant applicants shall:
(A) demonstrate that the municipality has a separate financial
account that shall be used solely for administering funds for the municipality’s
community nurse or community care coordinator program, or alternatively,
demonstrate that a qualifying nonprofit organization is available to receive and
VT LEG #379748 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.140
2025 Page 3 of 5
administer the grant funding to pay for community nurse or community care
coordinator services;
(B) demonstrate that the municipality’s community nurse or
community care coordinator program structure has fiscal and organizational
transparency;
(C) provide documentation that the legislative body of the
municipality has approved the community nurse or community care
coordinator program;
(D) describe the proposed collaboration between the community
nurse or community care coordinator and the municipality, including the
community nurse or community coordinator’s anticipated duties, work hours,
and any specialized training necessary to provide services;
(E) describe the municipality’s plan for ongoing funding for the
community nurse or community care coordinator program once the
municipality is no longer eligible for grants under this section; and
(F) if applicable, describe any formal relationship between the
municipality and existing health care providers, including a federally qualified
health center.
(2) Joint applications. Two or more municipalities may submit a joint
application to support and extend shared services; however, each municipality
shall independently address the criteria in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
VT LEG #379748 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.140
2025 Page 4 of 5
(3) Limitations.
(A) Municipalities that currently have a community nurse or
community care coordinator may apply for grant funding to expand service;
however, municipal applicants seeking to establish new community nurse or
community care coordinator programs shall be given priority for grant funding.
(B) Applications to fund multiple community nurse or community
care coordinator positions within a municipality shall be considered to the
extent that the proposal reflects the municipality’s population and community
nurse service needs.
(C) A municipality shall be eligible for not more than five annual
grants.
(c) Awards granted. Awards granted by the Commissioner under this
section shall be provided directly to the applying municipality.
(d) Rulemaking. Pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the Commissioner shall
adopt rules necessary to administer the grant program established in this
section. The rules shall address:
(1) timelines for application and reapplication;
(2) application criteria; and
(3) procedures for review of grant expenditures and program evaluation.
VT LEG #379748 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.140
2025 Page 5 of 5
(e) Guidance and resources. The Department shall make guidance and
resources for community nurses and community care coordinators available
through its local health offices.
Sec. 3. APPROPRIATION
(a) Fiscal year 2026. In fiscal year 2026, $200,000.00 is appropriated to
the Department of Health from the General Fund for the purpose of funding
grants pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 9490 (community nurse and community care
coordinator grant program).
(b) Fiscal year 2027 and later. It is the intent of the General Assembly that
$200,000.00 be appropriated annually to the Department of Health from the
General Fund to fund the community nurse grant program established in
18 V.S.A. § 9490 (community nurse and community care coordinator grant
program).
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379748 v.1